Tennessee, session 114, HB0518.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 65-17-106, is amended by deleting
the language "On or before January 1, 2019, and on or before January 1 of each subsequent
year" and substituting instead "On or before February 1, 2026, and on or before February 1 of
each subsequent year".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0518
002206
- 1 -